California statutes. Elections Code
(a) A violation of Section 14027 is established if it is shown that racially polarized voting occurs in elections for members of the governing body of the political subdivision or in elections incorporating other electoral choices by the voters of the political subdivision. Elections conducted prior to the filing of an action pursuant to Section 14027 and this section are more probative to establish the existence of racially polarized voting than elections conducted after the filing of the action.

(b) The occurrence of racially polarized voting shall be determined from examining results of elections in which at least one candidate is a member of a protected class or elections involving ballot measures, or other electoral choices that affect the rights and privileges of members of a protected class. One circumstance that may be considered in determining a violation of Section 14027 and this section is the extent to which candidates who are members of a protected class and who are preferred by voters of the protected class, as determined by an analysis of voting behavior, have been elected to the governing body of a political subdivision that is the subject of an action based on Section 14027 and this section. In multiseat at-large election districts, where the number of candidates who are members of a protected class is fewer than the number of seats available, the relative groupwide support received by candidates from members of a protected class shall be the basis for the racial polarization analysis.

(c) The fact that members of a protected class are not geographically compact or concentrated may not preclude a finding of racially polarized voting, or a violation of Section 14027 and this section, but may be a factor in determining an appropriate remedy.

(d) Proof of an intent on the part of the voters or elected officials to discriminate against a protected class is not required.

(e) Other factors such as the history of discrimination, the use of electoral devices or other voting practices or procedures that may enhance the dilutive effects of at-large elections, denial of access to those processes determining which groups of candidates will receive financial or other support in a given election, the extent to which members of a protected class bear the effects of past discrimination in areas such as education, employment, and health, which hinder their ability to participate effectively in the political process, and the use of overt or subtle racial appeals in political campaigns are probative, but not necessary factors to establish a violation of Section 14027 and this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 129, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

14029.

Upon a finding of a violation of Section 14027 and Section 14028, the court shall implement appropriate remedies, including the imposition of district-based elections, that are tailored to remedy the violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 129, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

14030.

In any action to enforce Section 14027 and Section 14028, the court shall allow the prevailing plaintiff party, other than the state or political subdivision thereof, a reasonable attorney’s fee consistent with the standards established in Serrano v. Priest (1977) 20 Cal.3d 25, 48-49, and litigation expenses including, but not limited to, expert witness fees and expenses as part of the costs. Prevailing defendant parties shall not recover any costs, unless the court finds the action to be frivolous, unreasonable, or without foundation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 129, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

14031.

This chapter is enacted to implement the guarantees of Section 7 of Article I and of Section 2 of Article II of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 129, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

14032.

Any voter who is a member of a protected class and who resides in a political subdivision where a violation of Sections 14027 and 14028 is alleged may file an action pursuant to those sections in the superior court of the county in which the political subdivision is located.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 129, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 1.7. Voter Participation [14050. - 14057.]

14050.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the California Voter Participation Rights Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 235, Sec. 1.   (SB 415)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Section operative January 1, 2018, pursuant to Section 14057.)
-------------------------------------------

14051.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Political subdivision” means a geographic area of representation created for the provision of government services, including, but not limited to, a city, a school district, a community college district, or other district organized pursuant to state law.

(b) “Significant decrease in voter turnout” means the voter turnout for a regularly scheduled election in a political subdivision is at least 25 percent less than the average voter turnout within that political subdivision for the previous four statewide general elections.

(c) “Voter turnout” means the percentage of
 voters who are eligible to cast ballots within a given political subdivision who voted.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 235, Sec. 1.   (SB 415)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Section operative January 1, 2018, pursuant to Section 14057.)
-------------------------------------------

14052.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), a political subdivision shall not hold an election other than on a statewide election date if holding an election on a nonconcurrent date has previously resulted in a significant decrease in voter turnout.

(b) A political subdivision may hold an election other than on a statewide election date if, by January 1, 2018, the political subdivision has adopted a plan to consolidate a future election with a statewide election not later than the November 8, 2022, statewide general election.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 235, Sec. 1.   (SB 415)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Section operative January 1, 2018, pursuant to Section 14057.)
-------------------------------------------

14053.

Upon a finding of a violation of subdivision (a) of Section 14052, the court shall implement appropriate remedies, including the imposition of concurrent election dates for future elections and the upgrade of voting equipment or systems to do so. In imposing remedies pursuant to this section, a court may also require a county board of supervisors to approve consolidation pursuant to Section 10402.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 235, Sec. 1.   (SB 415)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Section operative January 1, 2018, pursuant to Section 14057.)
-------------------------------------------

14054.

In an action to enforce subdivision (a) of Section 14052, the court shall allow the prevailing plaintiff other than the state or political subdivision of the state, a reasonable attorney’s fee consistent with the standards established in Serrano v. Priest (1977) 20 Cal.3d 25, 48-49, and litigation expenses including, but not limited to, expert witness fees and expenses as part of the costs. A prevailing defendant shall not recover any costs, unless the court finds the action to be frivolous, unreasonable, or without foundation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 235, Sec. 1.   (SB 415)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Section operative January 1, 2018, pursuant to Section 14057.)
-------------------------------------------

14055.

A voter who resides in a political subdivision where a violation of subdivision (a) of Section 14052 is alleged may file an action pursuant to that section in the superior court of the county in which the political subdivision is located.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 235, Sec. 1.   (SB 415)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Section operative January 1, 2018, pursuant to Section 14057.)
-------------------------------------------

14056.

This chapter does not apply to special elections.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 235, Sec. 1.   (SB 415)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Section operative January 1, 2018, pursuant to Section 14057.)
-------------------------------------------

14057.

This chapter shall become operative on January 1, 2018.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 235, Sec. 1.   (SB 415)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Note: This section postpones, until January 1, 2018, the operation of Chapter 1.7, commencing with Section 14050.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Precinct Supplies [14100. - 14113.]

14100.

The county elections official, in providing the materials required by this division, shall not be required to utilize the services of the county purchasing agent.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14101.

(a) On or before the first day of January of each even-numbered year, the Secretary of State and the Attorney General shall prepare a brief digest containing the substance of those provisions of this code and of other statutes that pertain to the duties of precinct officers during the casting and the canvassing of the vote. This digest shall contain in each case a reference to the section of this code or other statute, by reference to which further examination of its provisions may be made.

(b) Immediately upon the completion of the digest set forth in subdivision (a), the Secretary of State shall send a copy to each county elections official.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14102.

(a) (1) For each statewide election, the elections official shall provide a sufficient number of official ballots in each precinct to reasonably meet the needs of the voters in that precinct on election day using the precinct’s voter turnout history as the criterion, but in no case shall this number be less than 75 percent of registered voters in the precinct, and for vote by mail and emergency purposes shall provide the additional number of ballots that may be necessary.

(2) The number of party ballots to be furnished to any precinct for a primary election shall be computed from the number of voters registered in that precinct as
 intending to affiliate with a party, and the number of nonpartisan ballots to be furnished to any precinct shall be computed from the number of voters registered in that precinct without statement of intention to affiliate with any of the parties participating in the primary election.

(b) For all other elections, the elections official shall provide a sufficient number of official ballots in each precinct to reasonably meet the needs of the voters in that precinct on election day, using the precinct’s voter turnout history as the criterion, but in no case shall this number be less than 75 percent of the number of registered voters in the precinct, and for vote by mail and emergency purposes shall provide the additional number of ballots that may be necessary.

(c) Notwithstanding
 subdivisions (a) and (b), in elections conducted using voter centers, the elections official shall provide sufficient materials for voting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 806, Sec. 44.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

14103.

(a) Before the opening of the polls at any election, the elections official shall cause to be delivered to the precinct board in each precinct in which the election is to be held, the proper number of ballots of the kinds to be used in that precinct. The ballots shall be delivered in sealed packages with marks on the outside clearly designating the precinct or polling place for which they are intended, and the number of ballots enclosed.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), in elections conducted using vote centers, ballots or ballot stock shall be delivered in sealed packages indicating the number of ballots or the amount of ballot stock
 enclosed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 806, Sec. 45.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

14104.

The elections official shall prepare a receipt for each polling place, enumerating the packages and stating the date of delivery to the precinct board member. The precinct board member shall sign the receipt upon receipt of the packages. The signed receipt shall be returned to the elections official. Messengers may be employed to insure the safe and expeditious delivery of the ballots. The elections official shall fix a reasonable compensation for the services of these messengers, to be paid in the same manner as other election expenses.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.

The elections official shall furnish to each polling place all of the following:

(a) At least one accessible copy of the voter list.

(b) Necessary printed blanks for the roster, tally sheets, voter list, declarations, and returns.

(c) Not fewer than 6 nor more than 12 instruction cards to each polling place for the guidance of voters in obtaining and marking their ballots. On each card shall be printed necessary instructions and the provisions of Sections 14225, 14279, 14280, 14287, 14291, 14295, 15271, 15272, 15273, 15276, 15277, 15278, 18370, 18380, 18403, 18563, and 18569.

(d) A digest of the election laws with any further instructions the county elections official may desire to make.

(e) An American flag of sufficient size to adequately assist the voter in identifying the polling place. The flag is to be erected at or near the polling place.

(f) A ballot container, properly marked on the outside indicating its contents. If it is necessary to supply additional ballot containers, these additional containers shall also be marked on the outside indicating their contents.

(g) At least one copy of the certified write-in list, if applicable.

(h) A sufficient number of cards to each
 polling place containing the telephone number of the office to which a voter may call to obtain information about the voter’s polling place. The card shall state that the voter may call collect during polling hours.

(i) An identifying badge or insignia for each member of the precinct board. The member shall print the member’s name on the badge or insignia, and shall wear the badge or insignia at all times in the performance of duties, so as to be readily identified as a member of the precinct board by all persons entering the polling place.

(j) Facsimile copies of the ballot containing ballot measures and ballot instructions printed in Spanish or other languages as provided in Section 14201.

(k) Sufficient copies
 of the notices to be posted on the voter list used at the polls. The notice shall read as follows: “This voter list shall not be marked in any manner except by a member of the precinct board acting pursuant to Section 14297. Any person who removes, tears, marks, or otherwise defaces this voter list with the intent to falsify or prevent others from readily ascertaining the name, address, or political affiliation of any voter, or the fact that a voter has or has not voted, is guilty of a misdemeanor.”

(l) A roster for each polling place in the form prescribed in Section 14107.

(m) Printed copies of the Voter Bill of Rights, as supplied by the Secretary of State. The Voter Bill of Rights shall be conspicuously posted both inside and outside every polling place.

(n) For a partisan primary election, printed copies of the posters or other materials described in Section 14105.2. The posters or other materials shall be conspicuously posted both inside and outside every polling place.

(o) Handheld magnifying glasses, displayed and available at the table or desk used by the precinct board.

(p) A signature guide card, to assist persons while signing their names on the roster, displayed and available at the table or desk used by the precinct board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 658, Sec. 1.   (AB 545)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.1.

In addition to the materials identified in Section 14105, the elections official shall furnish to the polling place printed copies of the notices specified in Section 9083.5, as supplied by the Secretary of State. The notices shall be conspicuously posted both inside and outside every polling place.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 806, Sec. 47.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.2.

(a) For a partisan primary election, the Secretary of State shall prepare and print posters or other materials that contain all of the following information:

(1) A statement that a voter who has declined to disclose a political party preference may vote in a political party’s partisan primary election if the political party, by party rule duly noticed to the Secretary of State, authorizes a voter who has declined to disclose a political party preference to vote in the next ensuing partisan primary election.

(2) The name of each political party that authorizes a voter who has declined to disclose a political party preference to vote in the partisan primary election.

(3) A statement that a voter who has declined to disclose a political party preference may request the ballot of one of the political parties that authorizes a voter who has declined to disclose a political party preference to vote in the partisan primary election.

(b) The Secretary of State shall supply the posters or other materials described in subdivision (a) to each elections official who shall furnish the materials to the precinct officers pursuant to Section 14105.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 819, Sec. 3.   (AB 837)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.3.

(a) The federal Help America Vote Act of 2002 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20901 et seq.) requires voting information to be publicly posted at each polling place for each election for federal office. Voting information is defined as including general information on voting rights under applicable federal and state laws, including information on the right of an individual to cast a provisional ballot and instructions on how to contact the appropriate officials if these rights are alleged to have been violated.

(b) The Secretary of State shall print posters and other appropriate materials setting forth the voter rights listed in Section 2300. The posters
 shall be printed in as many languages as the Secretary of State determines are necessary, but, at a minimum, in sufficient languages to comply with Section 14201 and with the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10301 et seq.). The Secretary of State shall distribute the posters and materials to all county elections officials sufficiently in advance of statewide elections.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 806, Sec. 48.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.5.

Members of the precinct board shall not display, distribute, or make available at the polling place any materials other than those required pursuant to this division without the express approval of the county elections official.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1189, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

14106.

In addition to the materials required by Section 14105, the elections official shall provide signs, or materials for making signs, advising voters that an election has been canceled pursuant to Section 8026 due to the death of the candidate-incumbent and that a special election will be held to fill the vacancy.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14107.

(a) The roster to be kept by each precinct board shall contain all of the following:

(1) Space for the voter’s signature.

(2) The residence address of the voter.

(3) At the heading of each page or signature area, the following words: “WARNING: It is a crime punishable by imprisonment in the state prison or in county jail for anyone to fraudulently vote, fraudulently attempt to vote, vote more than once, attempt to vote more than one, impersonate a voter, or attempt to impersonate a voter (Sec. 18560, Elections Code).”

(4) Immediately below the final signature on the roster, the following statements:

(A) We hereby certify that all voters whose signatures appear hereinbefore in this roster voted this day excepting the following who, after signing the roster, failed to vote or were challenged and denied the right to vote.No.NameNo.Name(B) We further certify that the number of voters who voted in this precinct at this election is ____, and that the above list of voters, less those who did not vote as enumerated, constitutes the roster of this precinct for this election.

We further certify that the total number of official ballots received, voted, rejected, spoiled and
 canceled, found in the ballot container and the number accounted for is as indicated on the ballot statement.

We further certify that the assisted voters list and challenge list show a complete list of all voters assisted or challenged.ClerkClerkClerkInspectorAll members of the precinct board shall sign this certificate.

(b) When votes are counted at the precinct, all members of the board shall also sign the certificate of performance prescribed in Section 15280.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 806, Sec. 49.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

14109.

Notwithstanding Sections 14105 and 14107, the roster to be kept by each precinct board may be in a form of an index to the affidavits of registration for that precinct, in which case the index shall provide space of sufficient size to allow each voter to sign his or her name pursuant to Section 14216.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14110.

All officers required by law to designate polling places shall furnish the polling places with a sufficient number of places, booths, or compartments, at or in which voters may conveniently mark their ballots, so that they may be screened from the observation of others. Each place, compartment, or booth shall be so adjusted as to conceal from any observation the voter’s marking of the ballot. The number of voting booths or compartments shall be determined by the officer conducting the election.

This section shall become
 operative on January 1, 1990.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14111.

Translations of the ballot measures and ballot instructions, as required by Section 14201, shall be provided by a person selected by the elections official who is one of the following:

(a) A certified and registered interpreter on the Judicial Council Master List.

(b) An interpreter categorized as “certified” or “professionally qualified” by the Administrative Office of the United States Courts.

(c) From an institution accredited by a regional or national accrediting agency recognized by the United States Secretary of Education.

(d) A current voting member in good standing of the American Translators Association.

(e) A current member in good standing of the American Association of Language Specialists.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 144, Sec. 2.   (SB 366)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

14112.

All voting equipment shall be transferred to the polling places in charge of an authorized official, who shall certify to their delivery in good order.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14113.

The containers of the ballots furnished to the polling places shall provide adequate protection for the ballots during storage and upon removing the ballots.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 806, Sec. 50.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Procedures at Polls [14200. - 14314.]



  ARTICLE 1. Election Day Posting Requirements [14200. - 14203.]

14200.

A member of each precinct board shall cause the following voting information to be publicly posted at each polling place:

(a) A sample version of the ballot that will be used for the election.

(b) Information regarding the date of the election and the hours during which polling places will be open.

(c) Instructions on how to vote, including how to cast a vote and how to cast a provisional ballot.

(d) Instructions for mail-in registrants and first-time voters under Section
 303(b) of the federal Help America Vote Act of 2002
 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20901 et seq.).

(e) General information on voting rights under applicable federal and state laws, including information on the right of an individual to cast a provisional ballot and instructions on how to contact the appropriate officials if these rights are alleged to have been violated.

(f) General information on federal and state laws regarding prohibitions on acts of fraud and misrepresentation as they pertain to elections.

(g) Information regarding the languages other than English in which members of the precinct board can assist voters. The information shall be provided in all of the languages other than English spoken by the
 members.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 845, Sec. 8.5.   (AB 918)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

14201.

(a) In counties and precincts where the Secretary of State has determined that it is appropriate, the county elections official shall provide facsimile copies of the ballot, as described in subdivision (b), with the ballot measures and ballot instructions printed in Spanish, one of which shall be posted in a conspicuous location in the polling place and at least one of which shall be made available for voters at the polling place to use as a reference when casting a private ballot. Facsimile ballots shall also be printed in other languages and provided in the same manner if a significant and substantial need is found by the Secretary of State. A facsimile copy of the ballot available for voters to use in casting a private ballot shall be sufficiently distinct in appearance from a regular ballot to prevent voters from attempting
 to vote on the facsimile copy.

(b) (1) In determining if it is appropriate to provide the election materials in Spanish or other languages, the Secretary of State shall determine the number of residents of voting age in each county and precinct who are members of a single language minority, and who lack sufficient skills in English to vote without assistance. If the number of these residents equals 3 percent or more of the voting-age residents of a particular county or precinct, or if interested citizens or organizations provide the Secretary of State with information that gives the Secretary of State sufficient reason to believe a need for the furnishing of facsimile ballots, the Secretary of State shall find a need to provide at least two facsimile copies with the ballot measures and ballot instructions printed in Spanish or other applicable language in the affected polling places.

(2) If the Secretary of State determines that the number of voting-age residents in a precinct who are members of a single language minority and who lack sufficient skills in English to vote without assistance exceeds 20 percent of the voting-age residents in that precinct, the county elections official shall provide at least four facsimile copies of the ballot in the language of that language minority, one of which shall be posted in a conspicuous location in the polling place and at least three of which shall be made available for voters at the polling place to use as a reference when casting a private ballot.

(c) (1) In polling places where facsimile copies of the ballot are necessary, members of the precinct boards shall be trained on the purpose and proper handling of the facsimile copies of the ballot and shall be prepared to inform voters of the existence
 of the facsimile copies of the ballot, as appropriate.

(2) If a voter requests a facsimile copy of a ballot that is available in the voter’s language of preference pursuant to subdivision (a), a member of the precinct board shall provide the facsimile copy of the ballot to the voter.

(3) In polling places where facsimile copies of the ballot are necessary, a sign near the roster shall inform voters of the existence of the facsimile copies of the ballot. The sign shall be in English and in the language or languages of the facsimile copies available in that polling place.

(d) At least 14 days before an election, the county elections official shall provide information on the county elections internet website identifying all polling places in the county and the languages of facsimile copies of the ballot that will be
 available to voters at each polling place. Explanatory information pertaining to the list of polling places, but not the list itself, shall be available in all languages in which the county provides facsimile copies of the ballot.

(e) The county elections official shall include text in the county voter information guide that refers voters with language needs to the portion of the county elections internet website containing the information specified in subdivision (d). The text shall be in all languages in which the county provides facsimile copies of the ballot.

(f) The Secretary of State shall make the determinations and findings set forth in subdivisions (a) and (b) by January 1 of each year in which the Governor is elected.

(g) (1) A county elections official shall not be required to provide
 facsimile copies of the ballot in a particular language if the county elections official is required to provide translated ballots in that language pursuant to Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.).

(2) In a polling place where a county elections official is required pursuant to subdivision (a) to provide a facsimile copy of the ballot in a language other than English, the county elections official may instead provide voters with a ballot translated into that language. A county elections official who provides and publicizes translated ballots in the same manner as translated ballots provided and publicized pursuant to Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.), in lieu of providing facsimile copies of the ballot in any language required under subdivision (a), need not comply with subdivisions (c), (d), and (e) as pertaining to that language.

(h) It is the intent of the Legislature that non-English-speaking citizens, like all other citizens, should be encouraged to vote. Therefore, appropriate efforts should be made on a statewide basis to minimize obstacles to voting by citizens who lack sufficient skill in English to vote without assistance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 107.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

14202.

(a) Before opening the polls, the precinct board shall post in separate, convenient places at or near the polling place, and of easy access to the voters, at least one printed copy of the voter list for that polling place. The copies of the voter list shall be by street address in numerical order.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), in elections conducted using vote centers, at each polling place the elections official or the precinct board shall provide access to the voter list.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 806, Sec. 52.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

14203.

The precinct officer shall post the signs required by Section 14106 in plain view within each voting booth or compartment whenever an election has been canceled pursuant to Section 8026.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Election Day Procedures [14210. - 14227.5.]

14210.

The members of each precinct board shall distribute the duties devolving upon the precinct board, which are in addition to their individual duties, in a manner they deem most advantageous.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14211.

The polling places shall be arranged so that neither the ballot containers nor the voting booths or compartments shall be hidden from the view of those present.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14212.

The polls shall be open at 7 a.m. of the day of any election, and shall be kept open until 8 p.m. of the same day, when the polls shall be closed, except as provided in Sections 4005 and 14401.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 479, Sec. 10.   (AB 1762)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

14213.

Before the precinct board receives any ballots, it shall proclaim aloud at the place of election that the polls are open.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14214.

Voting shall commence as soon as the polls are opened and shall be continued during the time the polls remain open.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14215.

Before receiving any ballots, the precinct board, in the presence of any persons assembled at the polling place, shall open and exhibit and close the ballot container or containers. Thereafter, the ballot container or containers shall not be removed from the polling place or presence of the bystanders until all the ballots are counted, nor opened until after the polls are finally closed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14216.

(a) Any person desiring to vote shall state or provide his or her name and address and, upon the precinct officers finding the name in the roster, the voter shall then sign his or her name in the space provided or, if the voter is unable to sign, shall have his or her name signed by another person on the roster provided for that purpose, whereupon a challenge may be interposed as provided in this article.

(b) The signature shall be capable of being retained for the prescribed retention period for the election being conducted.

(c) This section does not prohibit the use of technology to capture
 the signature prescribed by subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 806, Sec. 54.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

14217.

If the precinct board is unable to find a voter’s name upon the roster, it shall inform the voter that he or she may cast a provisional ballot and the procedure for doing so. If the voter elects to cast a provisional ballot, the precinct board shall furnish the voter with a provisional ballot, in accordance with Section 14310.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 806, Sec. 55.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

14218.

If the surname of any person offering to vote has been changed since the person has registered, the person shall sign his or her name as it was before the change and also the appropriate name as it is at the time the person votes, indicating on the roster on the same line by brackets or other means that the two names are the name of one person.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14219.

The precinct board shall provide, upon request, to a voter for use in the voting booth or compartment, a copy of the facsimile ballot containing ballot measures and instructions printed in Spanish or in other languages, as required by Section 14201, unless county voter information guides and ballots for voting are already being provided in that language under the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965, as amended by Public Law 94-73.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 422, Sec. 78.   (AB 2911)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

14220.

At any election, a majority of the members of any precinct board shall be present at the polling place at all times while the polling place is open.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14221.

Only voters engaged in receiving, preparing, or depositing their ballots and persons authorized by the precinct board to keep order and enforce the law may be permitted to be within the voting booth area before the closing of the polls.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14222.

Nothing contained in this code shall prevent a voter from being accompanied by a child or children under the age of 18 years while the voter is within the voting booth area if the child is, or children are, under the voter’s care.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 104, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

14223.

(a) Only members of the precinct board, and persons while signing their names on the roster, shall be permitted, during the hours within which voting is in progress, to sit at the desk or table used by the precinct board.

(b) Any person may inspect the roster while voting is in progress and while votes are being counted. However, this shall not be done at a time or in a manner which will impede, interfere, or interrupt the normal process of voting.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14224.

(a) Except as provided in Section 14222, a voting booth or compartment shall not be occupied by more than one person at a time, unless the voter is eligible under the assisted-voter provisions.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), a voter shall not remain in or occupy a voting booth or compartment longer than is necessary to mark his or her ballot, which shall not exceed 10 minutes.

(2) If a voter informs a precinct board member that the voter requires additional time to mark his or her ballot, a longer period shall be allowed. However, if the precinct board member determines that the voter
 is attempting to interfere with the conduct of the election and does not require additional time to mark his or her ballot, the precinct board member may contact the elections official, who may order that the voter not be provided with additional time to mark his or her ballot.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 238, Sec. 1.   (AB 1724)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

14225.

Members of the precinct board shall not deposit in the ballot container any ballot from which the slip containing the number of the ballot has not been removed by a member of the precinct board and handed to the voter. This section does not apply to a vote by mail ballot.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 547, Sec. 5.   (AB 1572)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

14227.
